Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-609
Impersonating a public servant; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of impersonating a public servant if he falsely pretends to be a public servant other than a peace officer and performs any act in that pretended capacity.

(2) It is no defense to a prosecution under this section that the office the actor pretended to hold did not in fact exist.

(3) Impersonating a public servant is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 131.